Missouri, session 2026, HB2455.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 213.010, 213.020, 213.030, 213.040, 213.041, 213.045, 213.050,
213.070, 213.075, 213.076, 213.077, 213.085, 213.095, 213.101, 213.111, 213.112, 213.126,
213.135, and 510.265, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-eight new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 213.010, 213.020, 213.030, 213.070, 213.075, 213.077,
213.085, 213.095, 213.101, 213.111, 213.126, 213.135, 213.150, 213.151, 213.152, 213.155,
213.158, 213.161, 213.164, 213.167, 213.170, 213.173, 213.176, 213.179, 213.182, 213.185,
213.188, and 510.265, to read as follows:
213.010. As used in [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Age", an age of forty or more years but less than seventy years, except that it
shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to require the compulsory
retirement of any person who has attained the age of sixty-five and who, for the two-year
period immediately before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or high policy-
making position, if such person is entitled to an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement
benefit from a pension, profit sharing, savings or deferred compensation plan, or any
combination of such plans, of the employer, which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four
thousand dollars;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2455 2
(2) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to the adverse decision or action, the
protected criterion was [the motivating] a contributing factor;
(3) "Commission", the Missouri commission on human rights;
(4) "Complainant", a person who has filed a complaint with the commission alleging
that another person has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
(5) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or
more of a person's major life activities, being regarded as having such an impairment, or a
record of having such an impairment, which with or without reasonable accommodation does
not interfere with performing the job[,] or utilizing the place of public accommodation[, or
occupying the dwelling in question. For purposes of this chapter,]. The term "disability"
does not include current[,] illegal use of, or addiction to, a controlled substance as such term
is defined by section 195.010; however, a person may be considered to have a disability if that
person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug rehabilitation program and is no
longer engaging in the illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a controlled substance or
has otherwise been rehabilitated successfully and is no longer engaging in such use and is not
currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised rehabilitation program and is no longer engaging
in illegal use of controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally using, or being addicted to, a
controlled substance;
(6) "Discrimination", conduct proscribed herein, taken because of race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, [or] age as it relates to employment, or disability[, or
familial status as it relates to housing];
(7) ["Dwelling", any building, structure or portion thereof which is occupied as, or
designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant
land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure or portion thereof;
(8)] "Employer", [a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has six or
more employees for each working day in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the
current or preceding calendar year, and shall include] the state, [or] any political or civil
subdivision thereof, [or] any person employing six or more persons within the state, or any
person directly acting in the interest of an employer, but "employer" does not include
corporations and associations owned [or] and operated by religious or sectarian
[organizations. "Employer" shall not include:
(a) The United States;
(b) A corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States;

HB 2455 3
(c) An individual employed by an employer;
(d) An Indian tribe;
(e) Any department or agency of the District of Columbia subject by statute to
procedures of the competitive service, as defined in 5 U.S.C. Section 2101; or
(f) A bona fide private membership club, other than a labor organization, that is
exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)] groups;
[(9)] (8) "Employment agency" includes any person or agency, public or private,
regularly undertaking with or without compensation to procure employees for an employer or
to procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer and includes any person
acting in the interest of such a person or agency;
[(10)] (9) "Executive director", the executive director of the Missouri commission on
human rights;
[(11) "Familial status", one or more individuals who have not attained the age of
eighteen years being domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual; or
(b) The designee of such parent or other person having such custody, with the written
permission of such parent or other person. The protections afforded against discrimination
because of familial status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen years;
(12)] (10) "Human rights fund", a fund established to receive civil penalties as
required by federal regulations and as set forth by subdivision (2) of subsection 11 of section
[213.075] 213.167, and which will be disbursed to offset additional expenses related to
compliance with the Department of Housing and Urban Development regulations;
[(13)] (11) "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning
grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
relation to employment;
[(14)] (12) "Local commissions", any commission or agency established prior to
August 13, 1986, by an ordinance or order adopted by the governing body of any city,
constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
[(15)] (13) "Person" includes one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships,
associations, organizations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies,
joint stock companies, trusts, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other
organized groups of persons;
[(16)] (14) "Places of public accommodation", all places or businesses offering or
holding out to the general public, goods, services, privileges, facilities, advantages or
accommodations for the peace, comfort, health, welfare and safety of the general public or

HB 2455 4
such public places providing food, shelter, recreation and amusement, including, but not
limited to:
(a) Any inn, hotel, motel, or other establishment which provides lodging to transient
guests, other than an establishment located within a building which contains not more than
five rooms for rent or hire and which is actually occupied by the proprietor of such
establishment as [his] the proprietor's residence;
(b) Any restaurant, cafeteria, lunchroom, lunch counter, soda fountain, or other
facility principally engaged in selling food for consumption on the premises, including, but
not limited to, any such facility located on the premises of any retail establishment;
(c) Any gasoline station, including all facilities located on the premises of such
gasoline station and made available to the patrons thereof;
(d) Any motion picture house, theater, concert hall, sports arena, stadium, or other
place of exhibition or entertainment;
(e) Any public facility owned, operated, or managed by or on behalf of this state or
any agency or subdivision thereof, or any public corporation; and any such facility supported
100 in whole or in part by public funds;
101 (f) Any establishment which is physically located within the premises of any
102 establishment otherwise covered by this section or within the premises of which is physically
103 located any such covered establishment, and which holds itself out as serving patrons of such
104 covered establishment;
105 [(17) "Rent" includes to lease, to sublease, to let and otherwise to grant for
106 consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
107 (18)] (15) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to have engaged in a prohibited
108 discriminatory practice in a complaint filed with the commission;
109 [(19) "The motivating factor", the employee's protected classification actually played
110 a role in the adverse action or decision and had a determinative influence on the adverse
111 decision or action;
112 (20)] (16) "Unlawful discriminatory practice", any act that is unlawful under [this
113 chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137.
213.020. 1. There is hereby created a "Missouri Commission on Human Rights". It
shall consist of eleven members, with no less than one from each of the congressional districts
of this state, serving without compensation, to be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate. One of the members shall be appointed chairperson by the
governor. Appointments to the commission shall be for a term of six years. No more than six
members at any one time shall be members of the same political party. In the event of the
death or resignation of any member, his or her successor shall be appointed to serve for the
unexpired period of the term for which such member had been appointed.

HB 2455 5
2. [The] A function of the commission shall be to encourage fair treatment for and to
foster mutual understanding and respect among, and to discourage discrimination in
employment and public accommodation against, any racial, ethnic, religious, or other
group protected by [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137, members of these groups, or
persons with disabilities.
3. Any local commission created and established prior to August 13, 1986, by an
ordinance adopted by the governing body of any city, constitutional charter city, town,
village, or county, shall have the power and authority to seek to eliminate and prevent
discrimination in employment[, housing,] and public accommodation[,] and to establish
related programs, which shall be certified by the commission as substantially equivalent. The
power and authority of such commissions to initiate and pursue administrative proceedings
and remedies shall be solely as provided in section 213.135.
213.030. 1. The powers and duties of the commission shall be:
(1) To seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination in employment and in places of
public accommodation because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, age as
it relates to employment, or disability[, or familial status as it relates to housing] and to take
other actions against discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, age, ordisability[, or familial status as provided by law; and]. The commission is hereby
given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes;
(2) To implement the purposes of this chapter first by conference, conciliation and
persuasion so that persons may be guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill be fostered;
(3) To formulate policies to implement the purposes of this chapter and to make
recommendations to agencies and officers of the state and political subdivisions in aid of such
policies and purposes;
(4) To appoint such employees as it may deem necessary, fix their compensation
within the appropriations provided and in accordance with the wage structure established for
other state agencies, and prescribe their duties;
(5) To obtain upon request and utilize the services of all governmental departments
and agencies to be paid from appropriations to this commission;
(6) To adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind suitable rules and regulations to carry
out the provisions of this chapter and the policies and practices of the commission in
connection therewith;
(7) To receive, investigate, initiate, and pass upon complaints alleging discrimination
in employment[, housing] or in places of public [accommodations] accommodation because
of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, age as it relates to employment, or
disability[, or familial status as it relates to housing] and to require the production for

HB 2455 6
examination of any books, papers, records, or other materials relating to any matter under
investigation;
(8) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths,
to take the testimony of any person under oath, and, in connection therewith, to require the
production for examination of any books, papers or other materials relating to any matter
under investigation or in question before the commission;
(9) To issue publications and the results of studies and research which will tend to
promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate discrimination in [housing,] employment or in
places of public accommodation because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry,
sex, age as it relates to employment, or disability[, or familial status as it relates to housing];
(10) To provide each year to the governor and to the general assembly a full written
report of all its activities and of its recommendations;
(11) To adopt an official seal;
(12) To cooperate, act jointly, enter into cooperative or work-sharing agreements with
the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, and other federal agencies and local commissions or
agencies to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(13) To accept grants, private gifts, bequests, and establish funds to dispose of such
moneys so long as the conditions of the grant, gift, or bequest are not inconsistent with the
purposes of this chapter and are used to achieve the purposes of this chapter;
(14) To establish a human rights fund as defined in section 213.010, for the purposes
of administering sections [213.040, 213.045, 213.050,] 213.070, 213.075, [and 213.076]
213.152, 213.158, 213.161, and 213.164.
2. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
536.024.
213.070. [1.] It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice [for an employer,
employment agency, labor organization, or place of public accommodation]:
(1) To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the commission of acts prohibited under
[this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137, or to attempt to do so;
(2) To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any other person because such
person has opposed any practice prohibited by [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137 or
because such person has filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in
any investigation, proceeding or hearing conducted pursuant to [this chapter] sections
213.075 to 213.137;

HB 2455 7
(3) For the state or any political subdivision of this state to discriminate on the basis
of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, age[,] as it relates to employment, or
disability[, or familial status as it relates to housing]; or
(4) To discriminate in any manner against any other person because of such person's
association with any person protected by [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137.
[2. This chapter, in addition to chapter 285 and chapter 287, shall provide the
exclusive remedy for any and all claims for injury or damages arising out of an employment
relationship.]
213.075. 1. [As a jurisdictional condition precedent to filing a civil action under this
chapter,] Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory practice [shall]
may make, sign, and file with the commission a verified complaint in writing, within one
hundred eighty days of the alleged act of discrimination, which shall state the name and
address of the [employer, employment agency, labor organization, or place of public
accommodation] person alleged to have committed the unlawful discriminatory practice and
which shall set forth the particulars thereof and such other information as may be required by
the commission. The complainant's agent, attorney or the attorney general may, in like
manner, make, sign, and file such complaint. [The failure to timely file a complaint with the
commission shall deprive the commission of jurisdiction to investigate the complaint. The
commission shall make a determination as to its jurisdiction with respect to all complaints.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a complaint is not filed
with the commission within one hundred eighty days of the alleged act of discrimination, the
commission shall lack jurisdiction to take any action on such a complaint other than to
dismiss the complaint for lack of jurisdiction. The failure to timely file a complaint with the
commission may be raised as a complete defense by a respondent or defendant at any time,
either during the administrative proceedings before the commission, or in subsequent
litigation, regardless of whether the commission has issued the person claiming to be
aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a civil action and regardless of whether
the employer asserted the defense before the commission.]
2. Any complaint which is filed with the federal Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission or other federal agencies with which the commission has a work-sharing or
deferral agreement, or with a local commission which has been certified as substantially
equivalent by the commission, shall be deemed filed with the commission on the date that
such complaint is received by such federal agency or local commission. A copy of all
complaints filed with a local commission with the authority to enforce the provisions of [this
chapter is to] sections 213.010 to 213.137 shallbe forwarded to the commission within seven
days of the filing thereof with such local commission. If a local commission has jurisdiction
to hear a complaint filed with the commission, such complaint shall be deemed to have been

HB 2455 8
filed with the local commission on the date on which such complaint was filed with the
commission. The commission shall, within seven days of the receipt of a complaint which a
local commission has jurisdiction to hear, forward a copy thereof to such local commission.
3. After the filing of any complaint, the executive director shall, with the assistance of
the commission's staff, promptly investigate the complaint, and if the director determines
after the investigation that probable cause exists for crediting the allegations of the complaint,
the executive director shall immediately endeavor to eliminate the unlawful discriminatory
practice complained of by conference, conciliation and persuasion, and shall report the results
to the commission. The investigation, determination of probable cause and conciliation shall
be conducted according to such rules, regulations and guidelines as the commission shall
prescribe.
4. A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint, but who is identified as
a respondent in the course of investigation, may be joined as an additional or substitute
respondent upon written notice, pursuant to such rules, regulations, and guidelines as the
commission shall prescribe. Such notice, in addition to complying with the requirements of
such rules, regulations, and guidelines, shall also state the reason why the person to whom the
notice is addressed has been joined as a party.
5. In case of failure to eliminate such discriminatory practice as found in the
investigation, if in the judgment of the chairperson of the commission circumstances so
warrant, there shall be issued and served in the name of the commission, a written notice,
together with a copy of the complaint, as it may have been amended, requiring the person
named in the complaint, hereinafter referred to as "respondent", to answer the charges of the
complaint at a hearing, at a time and place to be specified in the notice, before a panel of at
least three members of the commission sitting as the commission or before a hearing
examiner licensed to practice law in this state who shall be appointed by the executive
director and approved by the commission. The place of the hearing shall be in the office of
the commission or such other place designated by it, except that if the respondent so requests,
in writing, the hearing shall be held in the county of such person's residence or business
location at the time of the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice. A copy of the notice shall
also be served on the complainants.
6. [In all cases where a written notice of hearing has been issued and a party has not
elected the option to proceed in circuit court as set forth in section 213.076, the procedures set
forth for a hearing shall apply.
7.] The commission shall be a party to the action and shall be represented before the
panel or the hearing examiner by the office of the attorney general or, when so delegated by
the attorney general, a staff attorney of the commission. Neither the hearing examiner nor

HB 2455 9
any member of the panel shall have participated in the investigation of the complaint.
Evidence concerning endeavors at conciliation shall be excluded.
[8.] 7. The respondent may file a written verified answer to the complaint and appear
at the hearing in person or otherwise with or without counsel, and submit testimony. At the
discretion of the hearing examiner or the panel, the complainant may be allowed to intervene,
thereby becoming a party to the action with the right to present testimony in person or by
counsel, provided the complainant at all times shall be treated as a party for the purpose of
discovery and the taking of depositions. The commission or complainant intervenor shall
have the power to reasonably and fairly amend any complaint, and the respondent shall have
like power to amend any answer. The testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and
be transcribed.
[9.] 8. In any contested case before the commission, any party may take and use
written interrogatories, requests for production of documents and other materials, and
requests for admissions, and all other forms of discovery authorized by rules of civil
procedure in the same manner, upon, and under the same conditions, and upon the same
notice, as is or may hereafter be provided for with respect to the taking and using of written
interrogatories, requests for production of documents and other materials, and requests for
admissions, and all other forms of discovery authorized by rules of civil procedure in civil
actions in the circuit court. The panel or hearing examiner shall have the authority to impose
sanctions in the same manner as set forth in the rules of civil procedure.
[10.] 9. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner provided by chapter 536.
[11.] 10. When the case is heard by a panel of the commission, the chairperson of the
commission shall select the hearing panel and the presiding officer. The presiding officer
shall have full authority to call and examine witnesses, admit or exclude evidence and rule
upon all motions and objections. The panel shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of
law, and if, upon all the evidence at the hearing, the panel finds[:
(1)] that a respondent has engaged in an unlawful discriminatory practice [as defined
in this chapter], the commission shall issue and cause to be served on the respondent an order
requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful discriminatory practice. The
order shall require the respondent to take such affirmative action, as in the panel's judgment
will implement the purposes of [this chapter,] sections 213.010 to 213.137 including, but not
limited to, payment of back pay; hiring; reinstatement or upgrading; restoration to
membership in any respondent labor organization; [the extension of full, equal and
unsegregated housing;] the extension of full, equal, and unsegregated public
100 accommodations; [extension of a commercial real estate loan or other financial assistance;
101 extension or restoration of membership or participation in any multiple listing service or other

HB 2455 10
102 real estate service organization or facility;] payment of actual damages; and the submission of
103 a report of the manner of compliance[;
104 (2) That a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a violation of section
105 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or 213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section
106 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of one or more of such other sections or relates to or
107 involves the encouraging, aiding, or abetting of a violation of such other sections, the
108 commission may, in addition to the relief provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, assess
109 a civil penalty against the respondent, for purposes of vindicating the public interest:
110 (a) In an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars if the respondent has not been
111 adjudged to have violated one or more of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of this
112 subsection within five years of the date of the filing of the complaint;
113 (b) In an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars if the respondent has been
114 adjudged to have committed one violation of the sections enumerated in subdivision (2) of
115 this subsection within five years of the date on which the complaint is filed;
116 (c) In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars if the respondent has been
117 adjudged to have committed two or more prior violations of the sections enumerated in
118 subdivision (2) of this subsection within seven years of the date on which the complaint is
119 filed.
120
121 All civil penalties set forth in this subsection shall be paid to the human rights fund].
122 [12.] 11. If, upon all the evidence, the panel finds that a respondent has not engaged in
123 any unlawful discriminatory practice, the panel shall state its findings of fact and conclusions
124 of law and shall issue and cause to be served on the complainant and respondent an order
125 dismissing the complaint.
126 [13.] 12. When the case is heard by a hearing examiner, the examiner shall have all
127 powers described in subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 213.030 and subsection [11]
128 10 of this section, for the purpose of the hearing. The hearing examiner shall make findings
129 of fact and conclusions of law and shall recommend to the commission an order granting such
130 relief as provided in subsection [11] 10 of this section or dismissing the complaint as to the
131 respondent as provided in subsection [12] 11of this section, in accordance with such findings.
132 [14.] 13. A panel of at least three members of the commission, sitting as the
133 commission, shall review the record, findings and recommended order of the hearing
134 examiner. The panel shall thereafter accept or amend the recommended order which shall
135 become the order of the commission. All orders shall be served on the complainant and
136 respondent, and copies shall be delivered to the attorney general and such other public
137 officers as the commission deems proper.

HB 2455 11
138 [15.] 14. No order of the commission issued pursuant to this section shall affect any
139 contract, sale, encumbrance or lease consummated before the issuance of such order and
140 involving a bona fide purchaser without actual notice of the charge filed pursuant to this
141 section.
142 [16.] 15. Any person aggrieved by an order of the commission may appeal as
143 provided in chapter 536.
213.077. 1. During the period beginning with the filing of a complaint under section
213.075, and ending with the filing of a charge, setting of a complaint for hearing or dismissal
of a complaint pursuant to the provisions of that section, the executive director and the
commission staff shall, to the extent feasible, engage in settlement and/or conciliation with
respect to the complaint. Any settlement and conciliation agreement negotiated during such
period shall be an agreement between the complainant and respondent and shall be subject to
approval by the executive director. Nothing said or done in the course of settlement or
conciliation under this section shall be made public or used as evidence in any subsequent
proceeding under [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137, without the written consent of
the complainant and respondent.
2. If a complaint has been filed pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065 or 213.070,
alleging commission of an unlawful employment practice or discrimination in public
accommodations:
(1) During investigation, the public shall not have access to records relating to the
complaint, nor shall any information relating thereto be released to the public;
(2) During investigation, the complainant and respondent shall only have access to
records they provided until the point at which disclosure is allowed at hearing, or if a request
for civil action is made under section 213.111 for a right to or other legal proceedings
pursuant to federal, state or local discrimination laws that require disclosure;
(3) Settlement agreements, executed during investigation shall be disclosed to the
public only by agreement of the complainant and respondent;
(4) After closure of a complaint, the public may only have access to the complaint
and closure documents by agreement of the complainant and respondent;
(5) Excluding a finding of probable cause, after an investigation closure, the
complainant and respondent may have access to the investigative file except for sensitive or
confidential records and records relating to witnesses who have requested anonymity. With
respect to records that the commission has obtained from other government agencies, the
commission [will] shall observe any statutory confidentiality provisions imposed on the
originating agencies;
(6) A conciliation agreement shall be disclosed to the public only by agreement of the
complainant and respondent;

HB 2455 12
(7) After failure of conciliation attempts, the complainant and respondent may have
access to copies of the investigative file, except for sensitive or confidential records and
records relating to witnesses who have requested anonymity;
(8) To achieve the purposes of [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137, this
subsection shall not apply to disclosure of information to representatives of interested federal,
state or local civil or human rights agencies.
[3. If a complaint is filed alleging violation of section 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or
213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves
violations of one or more of the other above enumerated sections or relates to or involves the
encouraging, aiding or abetting of violation of such sections:
(1) The public, complainant and respondent shall have access to records relating to
the complaint in the same manner as set forth in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (5), (7), and (8) of
subsection 2 of this section;
(2) Any settlement or conciliation agreement entered into by the complainant and
respondent shall be made public unless the parties thereto otherwise agree and the executive
director determines that disclosure is not required to further the purpose of this chapter.]
213.085. 1. All final decisions, settlement agreements, conciliation agreements,
findings, rules and orders of the commission under any provision of [this chapter] sections
213.010 to 213.137shall be in writing. Parties to proceedings shall each be sent a copy of the
commission's decision and order in the proceedings.
2. Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision, finding, rule or order of the
commission may obtain judicial review by filing a petition in the circuit court of the county of
proper venue within thirty days after the mailing or delivery of the notice of the commission's
final decision.
3. Judicial review shall be in the manner provided by chapter 536, as it may be
amended or superseded from time to time. The venue of such cases shall, at the option of the
appealing party, be in the circuit court of Cole County or in the county of the appealing party's
residence, or if the appealing party is a corporation, domestic or foreign, having a registered
office or business office in this state, in the county of its registered office or business office.
4. If no proceeding for review is instituted in the circuit court within the time herein
prescribed, the commission may obtain an order in a proceeding brought in the circuit court of
the county wherein the unlawful discriminatory practice which is the subject of the
commission's order occurred, or the county wherein any person required in the order to cease
and desist from an unlawful discriminatory practice, or to take other affirmative action,
resides or conducts business. The record on the commission's petition for enforcement shall
consist solely of duly certified records of the commission showing that it has jurisdiction over
the respondent, that the procedure prescribed by this action has been complied with, and a

HB 2455 13
certified copy of the commission's order with proof of service. On such a petition, the inquiry
of the court shall be limited to a determination of whether the action of the commission is in
excess of its statutory authority or jurisdiction and whether the respondent has substantially
complied with the order of the commission.
5. Where no proceeding for judicial review is filed within the time established under
subsection [3] 2of this section, and the commission has not filed a petition for enforcement of
its order in the circuit court, any person entitled to relief may, after the expiration of sixty
days from the date of the commission's order, file a petition for enforcement of the
commission's decision in a circuit court having proper venue thereof. The contents of the
petition and the jurisdiction of the court shall be as set forth in subsection 4 of this section.
6. Where a suit for enforcement of a commission order has been filed pursuant to
either subsection 4 or 5 of this section, the circuit court shall issue its order enforcing the
commission decision, unless the party against whom enforcement is sought affirmatively
shows that:
(1) The court is without jurisdiction or venue;
(2) Such commission order violates the provisions of the constitution of this state or
of the United States;
(3) The commission order is beyond its statutory authority or jurisdiction; or
(4) The party has substantially complied with the order of the commission.
7. Where the commission deems there has been a breach of the terms or conditions of
a settlement agreement or conciliation agreement, the commission shall institute an action in
circuit court to enforce the terms of the agreement or to obtain the appropriate remedy for
such breach. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the parties to such agreement from
personally filing suit to enforce this subsection.
213.095. Any person who shall willfully violate an order of the commission issued
and served under section 213.075 shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
213.101. [1.] The provisions of [this chapter] sections 213.010 to 213.137 shall be
construed to accomplish the purposes thereof and any law inconsistent with any provision of
[this chapter] those sections shall not apply. Nothing contained in [this chapter] sections
213.010 to 213.137 shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any law of this state
relating to discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, age,
or disability[, or familial status].
[2. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates the case of McBryde v. Ritenour
School District, 207 S.W.3d 162 (Mo.App. E.D. 2006), and its progeny as it relates to the
necessity and appropriateness of the issuance of a business judgment instruction. In all civil
actions brought under this chapter, a jury shall be given an instruction expressing the business
judgment rule.

HB 2455 14
3. If an employer in a case brought under this chapter files a motion pursuant to rule
74.04 of the Missouri rules of civil procedure, the court shall consider the burden-shifting
analysis of McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973), and its progeny to be
highly persuasive for analysis in cases not involving direct evidence of discrimination.
4. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by this statute the cases of
Daugherty v. City of Maryland Heights, 231 S.W.3d 814 (Mo. 2007) and its progeny as they
relate to the contributing factor standard and abandonment of the burden-shifting framework
established in McDonnell Douglas Corp. v. Green, 411 U.S. 792 (1973).
5. The general assembly hereby expressly abrogates by this statute the holding in
Hurst v. Kansas City Mo. School District, 437 S.W.3d 327 (Mo.App. W.D. 2014), that
Missouri Approved Instruction 19.01 may be applied to actions brought pursuant to this
chapter, and the holding in Thomas v. McKeever's Enterprises, Inc., 388 S.W.3d 206
(Mo.App. W.D. 2012), that juries shall not be instructed that plaintiffs bear the burden of
establishing "but for" causation in actions brought pursuant to this chapter.
6. The general assembly hereby abrogates all Missouri-approved jury instructions
specifically addressing civil actions brought under this chapter which were in effect prior to
August 28, 2017.]
213.111. 1. If, after one hundred eighty days from the filing of a complaint alleging
an unlawful discriminatory practice pursuant to section 213.055, 213.065 or 213.070 to the
extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a violation of section
213.055 or 213.065, or subdivision (3) [of subsection 1] of section 213.070 as it relates to
employment [and] or public accommodations, the commission has not completed its
administrative processing and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the commission
shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her right to bring a
civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in the complaint.
[If, after the filing of a complaint pursuant to sections 213.040, 213.045, 213.050 and
213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves a
violation of sections 213.040, 213.045 and 213.050, or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of
section 213.070 as it relates to housing, and the person aggrieved so requests in writing, the
commission shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or her
right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent named in
the complaint. The commission may not at any other time or for any other reason issue a
letter indicating a complainant's right to bring a civil action.] Such an action may be brought
in any circuit court in any county in which the unlawful discriminatory practice is alleged to
have [been committed] occurred, either before a circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon
issuance of this notice, the commission shall terminate all proceedings relating to the
complaint. No person may file or reinstate a complaint with the commission after the

HB 2455 15
issuance of a notice under this section relating to the same practice or act. Any action brought
in court under this section shall be filed within ninety days from the date of the commission's
notification letter to the individual but no later than two years after the alleged cause occurred
or its reasonable discovery by the alleged injured party.
2. Notwithstanding the fact that a person has not filed a complaint with the
commission as provided under section 213.075, a person claiming to be aggrieved may
bring a civil action in any circuit court in any county in which the unlawful
discriminatory action is alleged to have occurred, either before a circuit or associate
circuit judge.
3. The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or temporary
injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order, and may award to the plaintiff actual
and punitive damages, and may award court costs and reasonable [attorney] attorney'sfees to
the prevailing party, other than a state agency or commission or a local commission; except
that, a prevailing respondent may be awarded court costs and reasonable [attorney]
attorney's fees only upon a showing that the case was without foundation.
[3.] 4. Any party to any action initiated under this section has a right to a trial by jury.
[4. The sum of the amount of actual damages, including damages for future pecuniary
losses, emotional pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life,
and other nonpecuniary losses, and punitive damages awarded under this section shall not
exceed for each complaining party:
(1) Actual back pay and interest on back pay; and
(2) (a) In the case of a respondent who has more than five and fewer than one
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, fifty thousand dollars;
(b) In the case of a respondent who has more than one hundred and fewer than two
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, one hundred thousand dollars;
(c) In the case of a respondent who has more than two hundred and fewer than five
hundred one employees in each of twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding
calendar year, two hundred thousand dollars; or
(d) In the case of a respondent who has more than five hundred employees in each of
twenty or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, five hundred
thousand dollars.
5. In any employment-related civil action brought under this chapter, the plaintiff
shall bear the burden of proving the alleged unlawful decision or action was made or taken
because of his or her protected classification and was the direct proximate cause of the
claimed damages.]

HB 2455 16
213.126. 1. Whenever the attorney general has a reasonable cause to believe that any
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the full
enjoyment of any of the rights granted by this chapter or that any group of persons has been
denied any of the rights granted by this chapter, and such denial raises an issue of general
public importance, he or she may bring a civil action to any appropriate state court by filing
with it a complaint setting forth the facts and requesting such preventive relief, including, but
not limited to, an application for a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or
other order against the person or persons responsible for such pattern or practice or denial of
rights, as he or she deems necessary to ensure the full enjoyment of the rights granted by this
chapter.
2. If, at any time following the filing of a complaint alleging violation of one or more
of the provisions of sections [213.040] 213.055 to 213.070 or sections 213.152 to 213.164,
the chairperson determines that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposes
of this chapter, the chairperson may authorize a civil action for appropriate temporary or
preliminary relief pending final disposition of the complaint under the provisions of this
chapter. Upon receipt of such authorization, the attorney general may commence and
maintain an action seeking temporary or preliminary relief of an equitable nature in the circuit
court of the county in which the respondent resides or in any county in which respondent
conducts business.
3. Upon request by the commission, the attorney general shall take appropriate action
in circuit court to enforce a subpoena issued by the commission.
4. The attorney general may file suit to enforce a settlement or conciliation agreement
or any order of the commission referred by the commission or executive director.
213.135. 1. Any local commission authorized under subsection 3 of section 213.020
and certified by the commission as substantially equivalent shall, pursuant to the provisions of
this section, have power and authority to hear complaints of violations of this chapter that are
alleged to have been committed within the city, town, village or county which created the
commission, provided that no complaint against the state of Missouri, including the
University of Missouri system, or any official, officer, employee, department, agency, or
other agent or servant thereof shall be entertained by a municipal or county commission as
authorized in subsection 3 of section 213.020. Such authority may only be exercised in a
manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter. In furtherance of the authority granted
in this section, local commissions shall be empowered to hold hearings, subpoena witnesses,
compel their attendance, administer oaths, to take the testimony of any person under oath, and
to require the production for examination of any books, papers or other materials relating to
any matter under investigation or in question before the commission.

HB 2455 17
2. Any local commission authorized under subsection 3 of section 213.020 may be
empowered by the legislative body of the city, town, village or county it serves to exercise the
powers granted in this section, any provision of law, charter or ordinance to the contrary
notwithstanding.
3. Proceedings before the local commission shall be consistent with the requirements
of section 213.075[, with the exceptions that] if the matter relates to unlawful
discriminatory conduct proscribed under sections 213.010 to 213.137. If the matter
relates to conduct proscribed under sections 213.150 to 213.188, proceedings shall be
consistent with the requirements of section 213.167. In the context of these proceedings,
the references to the attorney general therein shall apply to an attorney or counselor for the
city, town, village or county, and [that] contested cases before the local commission shall be
heard by a hearing examiner who shall present to the local commission, or to a panel of
members thereof, proposed findings of fact, proposed conclusions of law, and a proposed
order, or who shall, if the municipal ordinance so provides, render findings of fact,
conclusions of law, and an order. Hearings before local commissions shall either be tape
recorded or held before a certified court reporter.
4. The order of a local commission shall not be final for appeal purposes until filed
with and reviewed by a hearing examiner of the commission. The order shall be filed with the
commission within thirty days of the date the local commission entered its order. Within
fifteen days of the filing of the order the local commission shall transmit the transcript of the
hearing previously reduced to writing to the commission. The local commission shall prepare
the transcript of the hearing and file with it all exhibits, whether received or rejected, with the
commission. The commission hearing examiner shall issue an opinion within ninety days of
receipt of the local commission's complete hearing record. Thirty days from the date of
issuance of the opinion, the order of the local commission shall become final for purposes of
appeal and may be appealed in the same manner as any other decision of the commission as
set out in section 213.085 for matters relating to unlawful discriminatory conduct
proscribed under sections 213.010 to 213.137 or as set out in section 213.176 for matters
relating to conduct proscribed under sections 213.150 to 213.188. If no opinion is issued
by the hearing examiner within ninety days, the local commission's decision shall be
considered final for purposes of appeal and may be appealed in the same manner as any other
decision of the commission as set out in section 213.085 for matters relating to unlawful
discriminatory conduct proscribed under sections 213.010 to 213.137 or as set out in
section 213.176 for matters relating to conduct proscribed under sections 213.150 to
213.188.
5. If no appeal from a final order of a local commission has been filed within thirty
days, a petition for enforcement of the order may be filed in the circuit court as provided in

HB 2455 18
section 213.085 for matters relating to unlawful discriminatory conduct proscribed
under sections 213.010 to 213.137 or as set out in section 213.176 for matters relating to
conduct proscribed under sections 213.150 to 213.188.
6. Local commissions may adopt procedural rules relating to the investigation,
settlement and conciliation of complaints and conduct of hearings, provided that such rules
and regulations are consistent with the provisions and spirit of this chapter. Such rules and
regulations shall be subject to review by the Missouri commission on human rights, and shall
not become effective until approved thereby. The commission shall have authority to
approve, disapprove, or approve with amendments any local commission rules submitted to it.
In the event that the commission approves local commission rules and regulations with
amendments, such rules shall become effective when the amendments are adopted by the
local commission.
213.150. 1. Sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be known as the "Missouri Fair
Housing Act".
2. A function of the commission shall be to encourage fair treatment of racial,
ethnic, religious, and other groups protected by sections 213.150 to 213.188; members of
these groups; and persons with disabilities. A function of the commission shall also be to
foster mutual understanding and respect among these groups, members of these groups,
and persons with disabilities and to discourage discrimination in housing against these
groups, members of these groups, and persons with disabilities.
3. The commission shall have jurisdiction and power to seek to eliminate and
prevent discrimination in housing because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status and to
take other actions against discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status. The
commission is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such purposes.
4. The commission shall issue publications and the results of studies and
research that tend to promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate discrimination in
housing because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, gender
identity, immigration status, or familial status.
5. The commission shall receive, investigate, initiate, and pass upon complaints
alleging discrimination in housing because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status and
require the production, for examination, of any books, papers, records, or other
materials relating to any matter under investigation.
6. Any local commission created and established prior to August 13, 1986, by an
ordinance adopted by the governing body of any city, constitutional charter city, town,

HB 2455 19
village, or county shall have the power and authority to seek to eliminate and prevent
discrimination in housing and to establish related programs that shall be certified by the
commission as substantially equivalent. Such commissions shall be certified in the same
manner as in section 213.131. The power and authority of such commissions to initiate
and pursue administrative proceedings and remedies shall be solely as provided in
section 213.135.
213.151. For purposes of sections 213.150 to 213.188, the following terms mean:
(1) "Because" or "because of", as it relates to the adverse decision or action, the
protected criterion was a contributing factor;
(2) "Commission", the Missouri commission on human rights;
(3) "Complainant", a person who has filed a complaint with the commission
alleging that another person has engaged in a prohibited discriminatory practice;
(4) "Disability", a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or
more of a person's major life activities, being regarded as having such an impairment,
or a record of having such an impairment, that with or without reasonable
accommodation does not interfere with occupying the dwelling in question. The term
"disability" does not include current illegal use of, or addiction to, a controlled
substance, as such term is defined in section 195.010; however, a person may be
considered to have a disability if that person:
(a) Has successfully completed a supervised drug rehabilitation program and is
no longer engaging in the illegal use of, and is not currently addicted to, a controlled
substance or has otherwise been rehabilitated successfully and is no longer engaging in
such use and is not currently addicted;
(b) Is participating in a supervised drug rehabilitation program and is no longer
engaging in illegal use of controlled substances; or
(c) Is erroneously regarded as currently illegally using or being addicted to a
controlled substance;
(5) "Discrimination", any unfair treatment based on race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial
status;
(6) "Dwelling", any building, structure, or portion thereof that is occupied as, or
designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families and any
vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of
any such building, structure, or portion thereof;
(7) "Executive director", the executive director of the Missouri commission on
human rights;

HB 2455 20
(8) "Familial status", one or more individuals who have not attained eighteen
years of age being domiciled with:
(a) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual; or
(b) The designee of a parent or other person having legal custody of such
individual, with the written permission of such parent or other person.

The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial status shall
apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any
individual who has not attained eighteen years of age;
(9) "Gender identity", the gender-related identity, appearance, mannerisms, or
other gender-related characteristics of an individual, with or without regard to the
individual's assigned sex at birth;
(10) "Human rights fund", the fund established by the Missouri commission on
human rights under section 213.030;
(11) "Immigration status", a person's authorized lawful presence or
unauthorized unlawful presence in the United States, including the actual or
perceived citizenship or immigration status of such person;
(12) "Local commission", any commission or agency established prior to August
13, 1986, by an ordinance or order adopted by the governing body of any city,
constitutional charter city, town, village, or county;
(13) "Person", one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations,
organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts,
trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, fiduciaries, or other organized groups of
persons;
(14) "Rent", to lease, to sublease, to let, and otherwise to grant for consideration
the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant;
(15) "Respondent", a person who is alleged to have engaged in a prohibited
discriminatory practice in a complaint filed with the commission;
(16) "Unlawful discriminatory housing practice", any act that is unlawful under
sections 213.150 to 213.188.
213.152. 1. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, to refuse to
negotiate for the sale or rental of, to deny, or to otherwise make unavailable a dwelling
to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability,
gender identity, immigration status, or familial status;
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of
sale or rental of a dwelling or in the provision of services or facilities in connection

HB 2455 21
therewith because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability,
gender identity, immigration status, or familial status;
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published, any
notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling that
indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion,
national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial
status or that indicates an intention to make any such preference, limitation, or
discrimination;
(4) To represent to any person because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status that any
dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental if such dwelling is in fact so
available;
(5) To induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by
representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a
person or persons of a particular race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex,
disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status;
(6) To discriminate in the sale or rental of, or to otherwise make unavailable or
deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability of:
(a) That buyer or renter;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is so sold,
rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that buyer or renter; or
(7) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of
sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with
such dwelling, because of a disability of:
(a) That person;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is so sold,
rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that person.
2. For purposes of this section and sections 213.158 and 213.161, discrimination
includes:
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with the disability,
reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person
if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the
premises, except that in the case of a rental, the landlord may, if it is reasonable to do so,
condition permission for a modification on the renter's agreeing to restore the interior of

HB 2455 22
the premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and
tear excepted;
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices, or
services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal
opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or
(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily
dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct
those dwellings in such a manner that:
(a) The public use and common use portions of such dwellings are readily
accessible to and usable by persons with a disability;
(b) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises within
such dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by persons in wheelchairs; and
(c) All premises within such dwellings contain the following features of adaptive
design:
a. An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental
controls in accessible locations;
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can
maneuver about the space.
3. As used in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the term "covered
multifamily dwellings" means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings have one or more
elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in buildings consisting of four or more units.
4. Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National
Standard for Buildings and Facilities, commonly cited as "ANSI A117.1", providing
accessibility and usability for people with physical disabilities, suffices to satisfy the
requirements of paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section.
5. If a unit of general local government has incorporated into its laws the
requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, compliance with
such laws shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of that subdivision. Such
compliance shall be subject to the following provisions:
(1) A unit of general local government may review and approve newly
constructed covered multifamily dwellings for the purpose of making determinations as
to whether the design and construction requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2
of this section are met;

HB 2455 23
(2) The commission shall encourage, but shall not require, the units of general
local government to include in their existing procedures for the review and approval of
newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings determinations as to whether the
design and construction of such dwellings are consistent with subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of this section and shall provide technical assistance to units of general local
government and other persons to implement the requirements of subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of this section; and
(3) Nothing in sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be construed to require the
commission to review or approve the plans, designs, or construction of all covered
multifamily dwellings to determine whether the design and construction of such
dwellings are consistent with the requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
section.
6. Nothing in sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be construed to invalidate or limit
any law of the state or any political subdivision of the state, or any other jurisdiction in
which sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be effective, that requires dwellings to be
designed and constructed in a manner that affords persons with disabilities greater
access than is required by sections 213.150 to 213.188.
7. Nothing in this section, section 213.158, or section 213.161 shall require that a
dwelling be made available to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct
100 threat to the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result in
101 substantial physical damage to the property of others.
102 8. Nothing in this section, section 213.158, or section 213.161 shall limit the
103 applicability of any reasonable local or state restriction regarding the maximum
104 number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling, nor shall any provision in this
105 section, section 213.158, or section 213.161 regarding familial status apply with respect
106 to housing for older persons.
107 9. (1) As used in this section, "housing for older persons" means housing:
108 (a) Provided under any state or federal program that the commission determines
109 is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons as defined in the state or
110 federal program;
111 (b) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons sixty-two years of age or older;
112 or
113 (c) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person fifty-five years of
114 age or older per unit.
115 (2) In determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older persons under
116 this subsection, the commission shall develop regulations that require at least the
117 following factors:

HB 2455 24
118 (a) The existence of significant facilities and services specifically designed to
119 meet the physical or social needs of older persons or, if the provision of such facilities
120 and services is not practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important
121 housing opportunities for older persons;
122 (b) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at least one person
123 fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and
124 (c) The publication of, and adherence to, policies and procedures that
125 demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons fifty-
126 five years of age or older.
127 10. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons
128 by reason of:
129 (1) Persons residing in such housing as of August 28, 2026, who do not meet the
130 age requirements of paragraph (b) or (c) of subdivision (1) of subsection 9 of this
131 section, provided that new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of
132 paragraph (b) or (c) of subdivision (1) of subsection 9 of this section; or
133 (2) Unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved for occupancy by
134 persons who meet the age requirements of paragraph (b) or (c) of subdivision (1) of
135 subsection 9 of this section.
136 11. Nothing in this section, section 213.158, or section 213.161 shall prohibit
137 conduct against a person because such person has been convicted by any court of
138 competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled
139 substance, as defined by section 195.010.
140 12. (1) Nothing in sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall prohibit a religious
141 organization, association, or society; or any nonprofit institution or organization
142 operated, supervised, or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious organization,
143 association, or society; from limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of dwellings that it
144 owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the same religion,
145 or from giving preference to such persons, unless membership in such religion is
146 restricted on account of race, color, or national origin.
147 (2) Nothing in sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall prohibit a private club, not in
148 fact open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides
149 lodging that it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting the
150 rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members or from giving preference to its
151 members.
152 13. Nothing in sections 213.150 to 213.188, other than the prohibitions against
153 discriminatory advertising in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section, shall apply
154 to:

HB 2455 25
155 (1) The sale or rental of any single-family house by a private individual owner,
156 provided the following conditions are met:
157 (a) The private individual owner does not own or have any interest in more than
158 three single-family houses at any one time; and
159 (b) The house is sold or rented without the use of a real estate broker, agent, or
160 salesperson or the facilities of any person in the business of selling or renting dwellings
161 and without publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement. If the owner selling
162 the house does not reside in it at the time of the sale or was not the most recent resident
163 of the house prior to such sale, the exemption in this section shall apply to only one such
164 sale in any twenty-four-month period; or
165 (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended
166 to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if the
167 owner maintains and occupies one of such living quarters as his or her residence.
213.155. 1. No declaration or other governing document of a homeowners'
association shall include a restrictive covenant in violation of section 213.152.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or provision of the governing
documents, the board of directors of a homeowners' association shall amend, without
approval of the owners, any declaration or other governing document that includes a
restrictive covenant in violation of section 213.152 and shall restate the declaration or
other governing document without the restrictive covenant but with no other change to
the declaration or governing document.
3. If, after providing written notice to a homeowners' association requesting that
the association delete a restrictive covenant in violation of section 213.152, the
association fails to delete the restrictive covenant within thirty days of receiving the
notice, the Missouri commission on human rights, a city or county in which a common
interest development is located, or any person may bring an action against the
homeowners' association for injunctive relief to enforce the provisions of subsections 1
and 2 of this section. The court may award attorney's fees to the prevailing party.
213.158. It shall be unlawful for any bank, building and loan association,
insurance company, or other corporation, association, firm, or enterprise whose
business consists in whole or in part of the making of commercial real estate loans to
deny a loan or other financial assistance because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status to a
person applying therefor for the purpose of purchasing, constructing, improving,
repairing, or maintaining a dwelling. It shall be unlawful to discriminate against such
person in fixing of the amount, interest rate, duration, or other terms or conditions of
such loan or other financial assistance because of the race, color, religion, national

HB 2455 26
origin, ancestry, sex, disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status of
such person or of any person associated with such person or of the present or
prospective owners, lessees, tenants, or occupants of the dwellings.
213.161. It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to, or membership or
participation in, any multiple listing service, real estate brokers' organization, or other
service organization, or any facility relating to the business of selling or renting
dwellings, because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability,
gender identity, immigration status, or familial status.
213.164. It shall be an unlawful discriminatory housing practice:
(1) To aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the commission of acts prohibited
under sections 213.150 to 213.188 or to attempt to do so;
(2) To retaliate or discriminate in any manner against any person because such
person has opposed any practice prohibited by sections 213.150 to 213.188 or because
such person has filed a complaint, testified, assisted, or participated in any manner in
any investigation, proceeding, or hearing conducted in accordance with sections 213.150
to 213.188;
(3) For the state or any political subdivision of this state to discriminate in
housing on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, disability,
gender identity, immigration status, or familial status; or
(4) To discriminate in any manner against any person because of such person's
association with an individual protected by sections 213.150 to 213.188.
213.167. 1. Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discriminatory
housing practice may make, sign, and file with the commission a verified complaint in
writing, within one hundred eighty days of the alleged act of discrimination, which shall
state the name and address of the person alleged to have committed the unlawful
discriminatory housing practice and which shall set forth the particulars thereof and
such other information as may be required by the commission. The complainant's
agent, attorney, or the attorney general may, in like manner, make, sign, and file such
complaint.
2. Any complaint that is filed with a federal agency with which the commission
has a work-sharing or deferral agreement, or with a local commission that has been
certified as substantially equivalent by the commission, shall be deemed filed with the
commission on the date that such complaint is received by such federal agency or local
commission. A copy of all complaints filed with a local commission with the authority to
enforce the provisions of sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be forwarded to the
commission within seven days of the filing thereof with such local commission. If a local
commission has jurisdiction to hear a complaint filed with the commission, such

HB 2455 27
complaint shall be deemed to have been filed with the local commission on the date on
which such complaint was filed with the commission. The commission shall, within
seven days of the receipt of a complaint that a local commission has jurisdiction to hear,
forward a copy thereof to such local commission.
3. After the filing of any complaint, the executive director shall, with the
assistance of the commission's staff, promptly investigate the complaint, and if the
executive director determines after the investigation that probable cause exists for
crediting the allegations of the complaint, the executive director shall immediately
endeavor to eliminate the unlawful discriminatory housing practice complained of by
conference, conciliation, and persuasion and shall report the results to the commission.
The investigation, determination of probable cause, and conciliation shall be conducted
according to such rules, regulations, and guidelines as the commission shall prescribe.
4. A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint but who is
identified as a respondent in the course of an investigation may be joined as an
additional or substitute respondent upon written notice under such rules, regulations,
and guidelines as the commission shall prescribe. Such notice, in addition to complying
with the requirements of such rules, regulations, and guidelines, shall also state the
reason the person to whom the notice is addressed has been joined as a party.
5. In a case of failure to eliminate such discriminatory practice as found in the
investigation, if the chair of the commission deems it warranted under the
circumstances, there shall be issued and served in the name of the commission a
written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, as it may have been amended,
requiring the person named in the complaint, hereinafter referred to as the
"respondent", to answer the charges of the complaint at a hearing, at a time and
place to be specified in the notice, before a panel of at least three members of the
commission, sitting as the commission, or before a hearing examiner licensed to practice
law in this state who shall be appointed by the executive director and approved by the
commission. The place of the hearing shall be in the office of the commission or such
other place designated by the commission, except that if the respondent so requests, in
writing, the hearing shall be held in the county of such respondent's residence or
business location at the time of the alleged unlawful discriminatory housing practice. A
copy of the notice shall also be served on the complainant.
6. If a written notice of hearing has been issued and a party has not elected to
proceed in circuit court as set forth in section 213.170, the procedures set forth for a
hearing in this section and in chapter 536 shall apply.
7. The commission shall be a party to the action and shall be represented before
the panel or the hearing examiner by the office of the attorney general or, if so delegated

HB 2455 28
by the attorney general, a staff attorney of the commission. Neither the hearing
examiner nor any member of the panel shall have participated in the investigation of the
complaint. Evidence concerning endeavors at conciliation shall be excluded.
8. The respondent may file a written verified answer to the complaint and
appear at the hearing, in person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit
testimony. At the discretion of the hearing examiner or the panel, the complainant may
be allowed to intervene, thereby becoming a party to the action with the right to present
testimony in person or by counsel, provided the complainant at all times shall be treated
as a party for the purpose of discovery and the taking of depositions. The commission
or complainant intervenor shall have the power to reasonably and fairly amend any
complaint, and the respondent shall have like power to amend any answer. The
testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and be transcribed.
9. In any contested case before the commission, any party may take and use
written interrogatories, make and use requests for production of documents and other
materials, make and use requests for admissions, and utilize all other forms of discovery
authorized by the rules of civil procedure in the same manner, upon, and under the
same conditions, and upon the same notice, as is or may hereafter be provided for with
respect to interrogatories, requests for production, requests for admissions, and all
other forms of discovery authorized by rules of civil procedure in civil actions in the
circuit court. The panel or hearing examiner shall have the authority to impose
sanctions in the same manner as set forth in the rules of civil procedure.
10. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner provided by chapter 536.
11. If the case is heard by a panel of the commission, the chair of the commission
shall select the hearing panel and the presiding officer. The presiding officer shall have
full authority to call and examine witnesses, admit or exclude evidence, and rule upon
all motions and objections. The panel shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of
law, and if, upon all the evidence at the hearing, the panel finds:
(1) That a respondent has engaged in an unlawful discriminatory housing
practice, the commission shall issue and cause to be served on the respondent an order
requiring the respondent to cease and desist from the unlawful discriminatory housing
practice. The order shall require the respondent to take such affirmative action as the
panel judges necessary to implement the purposes of sections 213.150 to 213.188
including, but not limited to, the extension of full, equal, and unsegregated housing;
extension of a commercial real estate loan or other financial assistance; extension or
restoration of membership or participation in any multiple listing service or other real
estate service organization or facility; payment of actual damages; and the submission
of a report of the manner of compliance; or

HB 2455 29
(2) That a respondent has engaged or is about to engage in a violation of section
213.152, 213.158, 213.161, or 213.164 to the extent that the alleged violation of section
213.164 relates to or involves a violation of one or more of such other sections or relates
to or involves the encouraging, aiding, or abetting of a violation of such other sections,
the commission may, in addition to the relief provided in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, assess a civil penalty against the respondent, for the purpose of vindicating
the public interest:
(a) In an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars if the respondent has not
been adjudged to have violated one or more of the sections enumerated in this
100 subdivision within five years of the date of the filing of the complaint;
101 (b) In an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars if the respondent has been
102 adjudged to have committed one violation of the sections enumerated in this subdivision
103 within five years of the date on which the complaint is filed; or
104 (c) In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars if the respondent has been
105 adjudged to have committed two or more prior violations of the sections enumerated in
106 this subdivision within seven years of the date on which the complaint is filed.
107
108 All civil penalties set forth in this subsection shall be paid to the human rights fund.
109 12. If, upon all the evidence, the panel finds that a respondent has not engaged in
110 any unlawful discriminatory housing practice, the panel shall state its findings of fact
111 and conclusions of law and shall issue and cause to be served on the complainant and
112 respondent an order dismissing the complaint.
113 13. If the case is heard by a hearing examiner, the examiner shall have all powers
114 described in subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 213.030 and subsection 11 of this
115 section for the purpose of the hearing. The hearing examiner shall make findings of fact
116 and conclusions of law and shall recommend to the commission an order granting such
117 relief as provided in subsection 11 of this section or dismissing the complaint as to the
118 respondent as provided in subsection 12 of this section, in accordance with such
119 findings.
120 14. A panel of at least three members of the commission, sitting as the
121 commission, shall review the record, findings, and recommended order of the hearing
122 examiner. The panel shall thereafter accept or amend the recommended order, which
123 shall become the order of the commission. All orders shall be served on the complainant
124 and respondent, and copies of all orders shall be delivered to the attorney general and
125 such other public officers as the commission deems proper.
126 15. No order of the commission issued in accordance with this section shall affect
127 any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of such

HB 2455 30
128 order and involving a bona fide purchaser without actual notice of the charge filed
129 under this section.
130 16. Any person aggrieved by an order of the commission may appeal as provided
131 in chapter 536.
213.170. 1. When a written notice of hearing is issued alleging a violation of
section 213.152, 213.158, 213.161, or 213.164, a complainant or respondent may elect to
have the claims asserted in that complaint decided in a civil action under the provisions
of this section in lieu of a hearing under the provisions of section 213.167. Written
notice of an election made under this subsection shall be filed with the commission and
all parties within twenty days of the date on which the written notice of hearing is placed
in the mail by the commission staff.
2. If a party elects under the provisions of this section to have the claims asserted
in a written notice issued by the chair decided in a civil action, the chair shall
immediately direct staff attorneys employed by the commission to commence and
maintain a civil action on behalf of the complainant. Such action shall be commenced
within thirty days of the election. All expenses of the claimant related to a civil action
brought under this section shall be paid by the commission.
3. Any person aggrieved with respect to the issues to be determined in a civil
action instituted under this section may intervene as of right in a civil action.
4. In a civil action instituted under this section, if the court finds that an
unlawful discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the court
may grant all relief as set forth in section 213.185. If monetary relief is sought for the
benefit of an aggrieved person who is not a party to the civil action, the court shall not
award such relief if such person has not complied with discovery orders issued by the
court.
5. The commission shall have authority to hire such attorneys as may be
necessary to perform duties assigned to it under this section.
213.173. 1. During the period beginning with the filing of a complaint under
section 213.167 and ending with the filing of a charge, setting of a complaint for hearing,
or dismissal of a complaint under the provisions of that section, the executive director
and the commission staff shall, to the extent feasible, engage in settlement or conciliation
with respect to the complaint. Any settlement and conciliation agreement negotiated
during such period shall be an agreement between the complainant and respondent and
shall be subject to approval by the executive director. Nothing said or done in the course
of settlement or conciliation under this section shall be made public or used as evidence
in any subsequent proceeding under sections 213.150 to 213.188 without the written
consent of the complainant and respondent.

HB 2455 31
2. If a complaint is filed alleging a violation of section 213.152, 213.158, 213.161,
or 213.164:
(1) During the investigation, the public shall not have access to records relating
to the complaint, nor shall any information relating thereto be released to the public;
(2) During the investigation, the complainant and respondent shall have access
to only those records that they have personally provided, until the point at which
disclosure is allowed at a hearing; however, if a request for civil action is made under
section 213.185, the complainant and respondent shall have access to those records
under applicable federal, state, or local discrimination laws that require disclosure;
(3) After closure of a complaint, the public shall have access to only the
complaint and closure documents by agreement between the complainant and
respondent;
(4) Excluding a finding of probable cause, after an investigation closure, the
complainant and respondent shall have access to the investigative file, except for
sensitive or confidential records and records relating to witnesses who have requested
anonymity. With respect to records that the commission has obtained from other
government agencies, the commission shall observe any statutory confidentiality
provisions imposed on the originating agencies;
(5) After failure of conciliation attempts, the complainant and respondent shall
have access to copies of the investigative file, except for sensitive or confidential records
and records relating to witnesses who have requested anonymity; and
(6) Any settlement or conciliation agreement entered into by the complainant
and respondent shall be made public unless the parties thereto agree otherwise and the
executive director determines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of
sections 213.150 to 213.188.
3. To achieve the purposes of sections 213.150 to 213.188, the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section shall not apply to disclosure of information to representatives
of interested federal, state, or local civil or human rights agencies.
213.176. 1. All final decisions, settlement agreements, conciliation agreements,
findings, rules, and orders of the commission under any provision of sections 213.150 to
213.188 shall be in writing. Parties to proceedings shall each be sent a copy of the
commission's decision and order in the proceedings.
2. Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision, finding, rule, or order of the
commission may obtain judicial review by filing a petition in the circuit court of the
county of proper venue within thirty days after the commission's final decision has been
made known.

HB 2455 32
3. Judicial review shall be in the manner provided by chapter 536, as it may be
amended or superseded from time to time. The venue of such cases shall, at the option
of the appealing party, be in the circuit court of Cole County or in the county of the
appealing party's residence or, if the appealing party is a corporation, domestic or
foreign, having a registered office or business office in this state, in the county of its
registered office or business office.
4. If no proceeding for review is instituted in the circuit court within the time
herein prescribed, the commission may obtain an order in a proceeding brought in:
(1) The circuit court of the county wherein the unlawful discriminatory housing
practice that is the subject of the commission's order occurred;
(2) The circuit court of the county wherein any person required in the order to
cease and desist from an unlawful discriminatory housing practice resides or conducts
business; or
(3) The circuit court of the county wherein any person required in the order to
take other affirmative action resides or conducts business.

The record on the commission's petition for enforcement shall consist solely of duly
certified records of the commission showing that it has jurisdiction over the respondent
and that the procedure prescribed by this action has been complied with and contains a
certified copy of the commission's order with proof of service. On such a petition, the
inquiry of the court shall be limited to a determination of whether the action of the
commission is in excess of its statutory authority or jurisdiction and whether the
respondent has substantially complied with the order of the commission.
5. If no proceeding for judicial review is filed within the time established under
subsection 2 of this section and the commission has not filed a petition for enforcement
of its order in the circuit court, any person entitled to relief may, after the expiration of
sixty days from the date of the commission's order, file a petition for enforcement of the
commission's decision in a circuit court having proper venue thereof. The contents of
the petition and the jurisdiction of the court shall be as set forth in subsection 4 of this
section.
6. If a suit for enforcement of a commission order has been filed under either
subsection 4 or 5 of this section, the circuit court shall issue its order enforcing the
commission's decision unless the party against whom enforcement is sought
affirmatively shows that:
(1) The court is without jurisdiction or venue;
(2) Such commission order violates the provisions of the Constitution of
Missouri or the Constitution of the United States;

HB 2455 33
(3) The commission order is beyond its statutory authority or jurisdiction; or
(4) The party has substantially complied with the order of the commission.
7. If the commission deems there has been a breach of the terms or conditions of
a settlement agreement or conciliation agreement, the commission shall institute an
action in circuit court to enforce the terms of the agreement or to obtain the appropriate
remedy for such breach. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the parties to such
agreement from personally filing suit to enforce this subsection.
213.179. Any person who willfully violates an order of the commission issued
and served under section 213.167 shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
213.182. The provisions of sections 213.150 to 213.188 shall be construed to
accomplish the purposes thereof, and any law inconsistent with any provision of sections
213.150 to 213.188 shall not apply. Nothing contained in sections 213.150 to 213.188
shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of any law of this state relating to
discrimination because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, age,
disability, gender identity, immigration status, or familial status.
213.185. 1. If, after the filing of a complaint under section 213.152, 213.158,
213.161, or 213.164, the person claiming to be aggrieved so requests in writing, the
commission shall issue to the person claiming to be aggrieved a letter indicating his or
her right to bring a civil action within ninety days of such notice against the respondent
named in the complaint. Such an action may be brought in any circuit court in any
county in which the unlawful discriminatory housing practice is alleged to have
occurred, either before a circuit or associate circuit judge. Upon issuance of this notice,
the commission shall terminate all proceedings relating to the complaint. No person
may file or reinstate a complaint with the commission after the issuance of a notice
under this section relating to the same practice or act. Any action brought in court
under this subsection shall be filed within ninety days from the date of the commission's
notification letter to the individual but no later than two years after the alleged cause
occurs or its reasonable discovery by the alleged injured party.
2. Notwithstanding the fact that a person has not filed a complaint with the
commission as provided under section 213.167, a person claiming to be aggrieved may
bring a civil action in any circuit court in any county in which the unlawful
discriminatory housing practice is alleged to have occurred, either before a circuit or
associate circuit judge.
3. The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or
temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order; may award to the
plaintiff actual and punitive damages; and may award court costs and reasonable

HB 2455 34
attorney’s fees to the prevailing party, other than a state agency or commission or a local
commission.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 3 of this section to the contrary, a prevailing
respondent shall be awarded court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees only upon a
showing that the case is without foundation.
5. Any party to an action initiated under this section has a right to a trial by jury.
213.188. Legally permissible actions under section 441.020 shall be subject to the
provisions of sections 213.150 to 213.188 only if a primary motive for the section 441.020
action is not any of the factors listed in section 441.020.
510.265. 1. No award of punitive damages against any defendant shall exceed the
greater of:
(1) Five hundred thousand dollars; or
(2) Five times the net amount of the judgment awarded to the plaintiff against the
defendant.

Such limitations shall not apply if the state of Missouri is the plaintiff requesting the award of
punitive damages, or the defendant pleads guilty to or is convicted of a felony arising out of
the acts or omissions pled by the plaintiff.
2. The provisions of this section and sections 510.261 and 510.263 shall not apply to
civil actions brought under section [213.111] 213.185 that allege a violation of section
[213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or 213.070, to the extent that the alleged violation of section
213.070 relates to or involves a violation of section 213.040, 213.045, or 213.050, or
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 213.070 as it relates to housing] 213.152, 213.158,
213.161, or 213.164.
[213.040. 1. It shall be an unlawful housing practice:
(1) To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, to
refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, to deny or otherwise make
unavailable, a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or familial status;
(2) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or
facilities in connection therewith, because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or familial status;
(3) To make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or
published any notice, statement or advertisement, with respect to the sale or
rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or
familial status, or an intention to make any such preference, limitation, or
discrimination;

HB 2455 35
(4) To represent to any person because of race, color, religion, national
origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or familial status that any dwelling is not
available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in fact so
available;
(5) To induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any
dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the
neighborhood of a person or persons because of a particular race, color,
religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or familial status;
(6) To discriminate in the sale or rental of, or to otherwise make
unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability
of:
(a) That buyer or renter;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it
is so sold, rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that buyer or renter;
(7) To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or
facilities in connection with such dwelling, because of a disability of:
(a) That person;
(b) A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it
is so sold, rented, or made available; or
(c) Any person associated with that person.
2. For purposes of this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050,
discrimination includes:
(1) A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with the disability,
reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by
such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full
enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord
may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification
on the renter's agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the condition
that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;
(2) A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies,
practices, or services, when such accommodations may be necessary to afford
such person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or
(3) In connection with the design and construction of covered
multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to
design and construct those dwellings in such a manner that:
(a) The public use and common use portions of such dwellings are
readily accessible to and usable by persons with a disability;
(b) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all
premises within such dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by
persons with a disability in wheelchairs; and
(c) All premises within such dwellings contain the following features
of adaptive design:
a. An accessible route into and through the dwelling;
b. Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other
environmental controls in accessible locations;

HB 2455 36
c. Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab
bars; and
d. Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a
wheelchair can maneuver about the space.
3. As used in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, the term
"covered multifamily dwelling" means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four or more units if such buildings have
one or more elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four or more
units.
4. Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American
National Standard for Buildings and Facilities providing accessibility and
usability for people with physical disabilities, commonly cited as "ANSI
A117.1", suffices to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (a) of subdivision
(3) of subsection 2 of this section.
5. Where a unit of general local government has incorporated into its
laws the requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this
section, compliance with such laws shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements
of that subdivision. Such compliance shall be subject to the following
provisions:
(1) A unit of general local government may review and approve newly
constructed covered multifamily dwellings for the purpose of making
determinations as to whether the design and construction requirements of
subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section are met;
(2) The commission shall encourage, but may not require, the units of
local government to include in their existing procedures for the review and
approval of newly constructed covered multifamily dwellings, determinations
as to whether the design and construction of such dwellings are consistent with
subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section, and shall provide technical
assistance to units of local government and other persons to implement the
requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section;
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the
commission to review or approve the plans, designs or construction of all
covered dwellings, to determine whether the design and construction of such
dwellings are consistent with the requirements of subdivision (3) of subsection
2 of this section.
6. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to invalidate or limit any
100 law of the state or political subdivision of the state, or other jurisdiction in
101 which this chapter shall be effective, that requires dwellings to be designed
102 and constructed in a manner that affords persons with disabilities greater
103 access than is required by this chapter.
104 7. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 requires
105 that a dwelling be made available to an individual whose tenancy would
106 constitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals or whose
107 tenancy would result in substantial physical damage to the property of others.
108 8. Nothing in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 limits the
109 applicability of any reasonable local or state restriction regarding the
110 maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling, nor does

HB 2455 37
111 any provision in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050 regarding
112 familial status apply with respect to housing for older persons.
113 9. As used in this section and sections 213.045 and 213.050, "housing
114 for older persons" means housing:
115 (1) Provided under any state or federal program that the commission
116 determines is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons, as
117 defined in the state or federal program;
118 (2) Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons sixty-two years of
119 age or older; or
120 (3) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person fifty-
121 five years of age or older per unit. In determining whether housing qualifies as
122 housing for older persons under this subsection, the commission shall develop
123 regulations which require at least the following factors:
124 (a) The existence of significant facilities and services specifically
125 designed to meet the physical or social needs of older persons, or if the
126 provision of such facilities and services is not practicable, that such housing is
127 necessary to provide important housing opportunities for older persons; and
128 (b) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at least one
129 person fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and
130 (c) The publication of, and adherence to, policies and procedures
131 which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for
132 persons fifty-five years of age or older.
133 10. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for
134 older persons by reason of:
135 (1) Persons residing in such housing as of August 28, 1992, who do
136 not meet the age requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this
137 section, provided that new occupants of such housing meet the age
138 requirements of subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 9 of this section; or
139 (2) Unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved for
140 occupancy by persons who meet the age requirements of subdivision (2) or (3)
141 of subsection 9 of this section.
142 11. Nothing in this section or section 213.045 or 213.050 shall prohibit
143 conduct against a person because such person has been convicted by any court
144 of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a
145 controlled substance, as defined by section 195.010.
146 12. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a religious organization,
147 association, or society, or any nonprofit institution or organization operated,
148 supervised or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious organization,
149 association, or society, from limiting the sale, rental or occupancy of dwellings
150 which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of
151 the same religion, or from giving preference to such persons, unless
152 membership in such religion is restricted on account of race, color, or
153 national origin. Nor shall anything in this chapter prohibit a private club not in
154 fact open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or purposes
155 provides lodging which it owns or operates for other than a commercial
156 purpose, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members
157 or from giving preference to its members.

HB 2455 38
158 13. Nothing in this chapter, other than the prohibitions against
159 discriminatory advertising in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section,
160 shall apply to:
161 (1) The sale or rental of any single family house by a private
162 individual owner, provided the following conditions are met:
163 (a) The private individual owner does not own or have any interest in
164 more than three single family houses at any one time; and
165 (b) The house is sold or rented without the use of a real estate broker,
166 agent or salesperson or the facilities of any person in the business of selling or
167 renting dwellings and without publication, posting or mailing of any
168 advertisement. If the owner selling the house does not reside in it at the
169 time of the sale or was not the most recent resident of the house prior to such
170 sale, the exemption in this section applies to only one such sale in any twenty-
171 four-month period; or
172 (2) Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or
173 intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of
174 each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies one of such living
175 quarters as his or her residence.]
[213.041. 1. No declaration or other governing document of a
homeowners' association shall include a restrictive covenant in violation of
section 213.040.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or provision of the
governing documents, the board of directors of a homeowners' association
shall amend, without approval of the owners, any declaration or other
governing document that includes a restrictive covenant in violation of section
213.040, and shall restate the declaration or other governing document without
the restrictive covenant but with no other change to the declaration or
governing document.
3. If after providing written notice to a homeowners' association
requesting that the association delete a restrictive covenant in violation of
section 213.040, and the association fails to delete the restrictive covenant
within thirty days of receiving the notice, the Missouri commission on human
rights, a city or county in which a common interest development is located, or
any person may bring an action against the homeowners' association for
injunctive relief to enforce the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this
section. The court may award attorney's fees to the prevailing party.
4. The provisions of this section shall become effective on January 1,
2006.]
[213.045. It shall be unlawful for any bank, building and loan
association, insurance company or other corporation, association, firm or
enterprise whose business consists in whole or in part in the making of
commercial real estate loans, to deny a loan or other financial assistance
because of race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability or
familial status to a person applying therefor for the purpose of purchasing,
construction, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling, or to
discriminate against him in fixing of the amount, interest rate, duration or

HB 2455 39
other terms or conditions of such loan or other financial assistance, because of
the race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, disability, or familial
status of such person or of any person associated with him in connection with
such loan or other financial assistance, or of the present or prospective owners,
lessees, tenants, or occupants, of the dwellings in relation to which such loan
or other financial assistance is to be made or given.]
[213.050. It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or
membership or participation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers'
organization or other service organization, or facility relating to the business of
selling or renting dwellings, because of race, color, religion, national origin,
ancestry, sex, disability, or familial status.]
[213.076. 1. When a written notice of hearing is issued alleging
violation of section 213.040, 213.045, 213.050, or 213.070, to the extent that
the alleged violation of section 213.070 relates to or involves violation of one
or more of such other sections or relates to or involves the encouraging, aiding
or abetting of violation of such sections, a complainant or respondent may
elect to have the claims asserted in that complaint decided in a civil action
under the provisions of this section in lieu of a hearing pursuant to the
provisions of section 213.075. Written notice of an election made pursuant to
this subsection shall be filed with the commission and all parties within twenty
days of the date on which the written notice of hearing is placed in the mail by
the commission staff.
2. Where a party has made an election pursuant to the provisions of
this section, to have the claims asserted in a written notice issued by the
chairperson, decided in a civil action, the chairperson shall immediately direct
staff attorneys employed by the commission to commence and maintain a civil
action on behalf of the complainant. Such action shall be commenced within
thirty days of the election. All expenses of the claimant related to a civil
action brought under this section shall be paid by the commission.
3. Any person aggrieved with respect to the issues to be determined in
a civil action instituted pursuant to this section may intervene as of right in a
civil action.
4. In a civil action instituted pursuant to this section, if the court finds
that an unlawful discriminatory practice has occurred or is about to occur, the
court may grant all relief as set forth in section 213.111. If monetary relief is
sought for benefit of an aggrieved person who is not a party to the civil action,
the court shall not award such relief if such person has not complied with
discovery orders issued by the court.
5. The commission shall have authority to hire such attorneys as may
be necessary to perform duties assigned to it pursuant to this section.]
[213.112. Legally permissible actions pursuant to section 441.020 are
subject to the provisions of this chapter only if a primary motive for the section
441.020 action is not any of the factors listed in section 441.020.]
✔